Washington statutes.
RCW 35.33.061

Budget—Notice of hearing on final.

Immediately following the filing of the preliminary budget with the clerk, the clerk shall publish a notice once each week for two consecutive weeks stating that the preliminary budget for the ensuing fiscal year has been filed with the clerk; that a copy thereof will be furnished to any taxpayer who will call at the clerk's office therefor and that the legislative body of the city or town will meet on or before the first Monday of the month next preceding the beginning of the ensuing fiscal year for the purpose of fixing the final budget, designating the date, time and place of the legislative budget meeting and that any taxpayer may appear thereat and be heard for or against any part of the budget. The publication of the notice shall be made in the official newspaper of the city or town.

[ 1985 c 469 s 27; 1973 c 67 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 95 s 8.]